Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.20
Commercial hazardous waste management facility; publication of notice; additional hearing; permit; issuance; conditions.

The department shall publish notice of an application for a permit for a commercial hazardous waste management facility, together with the action taken by the local governing body, the director's decision, and whether the permit will be granted or denied, in a legal newspaper either published in or having general circulation in the vicinity affected. A copy of such notice shall also be provided to the applicant. The public may comment or request a public hearing within thirty days after the date such information is made available, and the director may, within his or her discretion, hold a hearing on the granting or denial of the permit if he or she determines that the circumstances justify it.

Prior to issuing the permit, the director shall find that the applicant is a responsible and suitable person to conduct the business and that the proposed facility complies with the provisions specified in section 81-1521.19 and has the requisite approval of the local governing body. Permit conditions established by the department shall supersede any ordinances, resolutions, regulations, or requirements of the local governing body, then or thereafter in effect, which are inconsistent with such conditions.

Laws 1980, LB 853, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-1521.03;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 14.